Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB602.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 501.030 is amended to read as follows:
A person is not guilty of a criminal offense unless:
(1) He or she has engaged in conduct which includes a voluntary act or the omission to
perform a duty which the law imposes upon him or her and which he or she is
physically capable of performing; and
(2) He or she has engaged in such conduct intentionally, knowingly, wantonly or
recklessly as the law may require, with respect to each element of the offense,
except that this requirement does not apply to any offense which imposes absolute
liability, as defined in KRS 501.050.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/5/2026 10:59 AM Jacketed